dictionaries/ro-ro.aff
#********************************************************************************
# feminin
SFX r Y 36
SFX r icÄƒ ica icÄƒ                        s.f.sg.art.
SFX r icÄƒ ico icÄƒ
SFX r icÄƒ elei icÄƒ                         s.f.sg.dat.
SFX r icÄƒ ele icÄƒ                          s.f.pl.neart.
SFX r icÄƒ elele icÄƒ                        s.f.pl.dat.
SFX r icÄƒ elelor icÄƒ                       s.f.pl.dat.
SFX r È™cÄƒ È™ca È™cÄƒ                    s.f.sg.art
SFX r È™cÄƒ È™cao È™cÄƒ
SFX r È™cÄƒ È™tei [^a]È™cÄƒ                    s.f.sg.dat
SFX r È™cÄƒ È™te [^a]È™cÄƒ                    s.f.pl.neart.
SFX r È™cÄƒ È™tele [^a]È™cÄƒ                    s.f.pl.art.
SFX r È™cÄƒ È™telor [^a]È™cÄƒ                    s.f.pl.dat.
SFX r aÈ™cÄƒ aÈ™tei [^e]aÈ™cÄƒ                    s.f.sg.dat
SFX r aÈ™cÄƒ aÈ™te [^e]aÈ™cÄƒ                    s.f.pl.neart.
SFX r aÈ™cÄƒ aÈ™tele [^e]aÈ™cÄƒ                    s.f.pl.art.
SFX r aÈ™cÄƒ aÈ™telor [^e]aÈ™cÄƒ                    s.f.pl.dat.
SFX r aÈ™cÄƒ È™tei eaÈ™cÄƒ                    s.f.sg.dat
SFX r aÈ™cÄƒ È™te eaÈ™cÄƒ                    s.f.pl.neart.
SFX r aÈ™cÄƒ È™tele eaÈ™cÄƒ                    s.f.pl.art.
SFX r aÈ™cÄƒ È™telor eaÈ™cÄƒ                    s.f.pl.dat.
SFX r aÈ›Äƒ aÈ›a aÈ›Äƒ                s.f.sg.art.
SFX r aÈ›Äƒ aÈ›o aÈ›Äƒ
SFX r aÈ›Äƒ È›ei eaÈ›Äƒ               s.f.sg.dat
SFX r aÈ›Äƒ È›e  eaÈ›Äƒ              s.f.pl.neart.
SFX r aÈ›Äƒ È›ele  eaÈ›Äƒ              s.f.pl.art.
SFX r aÈ›Äƒ È›elor eaÈ›Äƒ              s.f.pl.dat.
SFX r aÈ›Äƒ eÈ›ei [^e]aÈ›Äƒ               s.f.sg.dat
SFX r aÈ›Äƒ eÈ›e  [^e]aÈ›Äƒ              s.f.pl.neart.
SFX r aÈ›Äƒ eÈ›ele  [^e]aÈ›Äƒ              s.f.pl.art.
SFX r aÈ›Äƒ eÈ›elor  [^e]aÈ›Äƒ              s.f.pl.dat.
SFX r gÄƒ ga gÄƒ          s.f.sg.art
SFX r gÄƒ go gÄƒ
SFX r gÄƒ gii gÄƒ         s.f.sg.dat
SFX r gÄƒ gi gÄƒ          s.f.pl.neart.
SFX r gÄƒ gile gÄƒ          s.f.pl.art.
SFX r gÄƒ gilor gÄƒ          s.f.pl.dat.

SFX R Y 72
SFX R È™cÄƒ È™ca È™cÄƒ                    s.f.sg.art
SFX R È™cÄƒ È™cao È™cÄƒ
SFX R È™cÄƒ È™tii [^a]È™cÄƒ                    s.f.sg.dat
SFX R È™cÄƒ È™ti [^a]È™cÄƒ                    s.f.pl.neart.
SFX R È™cÄƒ È™tile [^a]È™cÄƒ                    s.f.pl.art.
SFX R È™cÄƒ È™tilor [^a]È™cÄƒ                    s.f.pl.dat.
SFX R aÈ™cÄƒ ÄƒÈ™tii [^e]aÈ™cÄƒ                    s.f.sg.dat
SFX R aÈ™cÄƒ ÄƒÈ™ti [^e]aÈ™cÄƒ                    s.f.pl.neart.
SFX R aÈ™cÄƒ ÄƒÈ™tile [^e]aÈ™cÄƒ                    s.f.pl.art.
SFX R aÈ™cÄƒ ÄƒÈ™tilor [^e]aÈ™cÄƒ                    s.f.pl.dat.
SFX R aÈ™cÄƒ È™tii eaÈ™cÄƒ                    s.f.sg.dat
SFX R aÈ™cÄƒ È™ti eaÈ™cÄƒ                    s.f.pl.neart.
SFX R aÈ™cÄƒ È™tile eaÈ™cÄƒ                    s.f.pl.art.
SFX R aÈ™cÄƒ È™tilor eaÈ™cÄƒ                    s.f.pl.dat.
SFX R ancÄƒ anca ancÄƒ              s.f.sg.art.
SFX R ancÄƒ anco ancÄƒ
SFX R ancÄƒ ncei [^i]ancÄƒ             s.f.sg.dat.
SFX R ancÄƒ nce [^i]ancÄƒ              s.f.pl.neart.
SFX R ancÄƒ ncele [^i]ancÄƒ            s.f.pl.art.
SFX R ancÄƒ ncelor [^i]ancÄƒ            s.f.pl.art.dat.
SFX R ancÄƒ encei iancÄƒ             s.f.sg.dat.
SFX R ancÄƒ ence iancÄƒ              s.f.pl.neart.
SFX R ancÄƒ encele iancÄƒ            s.f.pl.art.
SFX R ancÄƒ encelor iancÄƒ            s.f.pl.art.dat.
SFX R anÄƒ ana [^e]anÄƒ              s.f.sg.art.
SFX R anÄƒ ano [^e]anÄƒ
SFX R anÄƒ enei [^e]anÄƒ             s.f.sg.dat.
SFX R anÄƒ ene [^e]anÄƒ              s.f.pl.neart.
SFX R anÄƒ enele [^e]anÄƒ            s.f.pl.art.
SFX R anÄƒ enelor [^e]anÄƒ           s.f.pl.dat.
SFX R anÄƒ ana eanÄƒ                  s.f.sg.art.
SFX R anÄƒ ano eanÄƒ
SFX R anÄƒ nei eanÄƒ                   s.f.sg.dat.
SFX R anÄƒ ne eanÄƒ                    s.f.pl.neart.
SFX R anÄƒ nele eanÄƒ                  s.f.pl.art.
SFX R anÄƒ nelor eanÄƒ                 s.f.pl.dat.
SFX R azÄƒ aza azÄƒ                     s.f.sg.art
SFX R azÄƒ azo azÄƒ
SFX R azÄƒ ezei azÄƒ                    s.f.sg.dat.
SFX R azÄƒ eze azÄƒ                     s.f.pl.neart.
SFX R azÄƒ ezele azÄƒ                   s.f.pl.art.
SFX R azÄƒ ezelor azÄƒ                  s.f.pl.dat.
SFX R ascÄƒ  asca ascÄƒ               s.f.sg.art.
SFX R ascÄƒ  asco ascÄƒ
SFX R ascÄƒ  eÈ™ti ascÄƒ                 s.f.pl.neart.
SFX R ascÄƒ  eÈ™tii ascÄƒ                s.f.sg.dat.
SFX R ascÄƒ  eÈ™tile ascÄƒ              s.f.pl.art.
SFX R ascÄƒ  eÈ™tilor ascÄƒ             s.f.pl.dat.
SFX R aie aia aie                       s.f.sg.art.
SFX R aie aio aie
SFX R aie Äƒii aie                        s.f.sg.dat.
SFX R aie Äƒi aie                         s.f.pl.neart.
SFX R aie Äƒile aie                       s.f.pl.art.
SFX R aie Äƒilor aie                      s.f.pl.dat.
SFX R icÄƒ ica icÄƒ                        s.f.sg.art.
SFX R icÄƒ ico icÄƒ
SFX R icÄƒ icii icÄƒ                         s.f.sg.dat.
SFX R icÄƒ ici icÄƒ                          s.f.pl.neart.
SFX R icÄƒ icile icÄƒ                        s.f.pl.dat.
SFX R icÄƒ icilor icÄƒ                       s.f.pl.dat.
SFX R ÄƒrÄƒ Äƒra ÄƒrÄƒ                         s.f.sg.art.
SFX R ÄƒrÄƒ Äƒro ÄƒrÄƒ
SFX R ÄƒrÄƒ erei ÄƒrÄƒ                         s.f.sg.dat.
SFX R ÄƒrÄƒ ere ÄƒrÄƒ                          s.f.pl.neart.
SFX R ÄƒrÄƒ erele ÄƒrÄƒ                        s.f.pl.art.
SFX R ÄƒrÄƒ erelor ÄƒrÄƒ                       s.f.pl.dat.
SFX R Äƒ a [^rnzci]Äƒ                         s.f.sg.art.
SFX R Äƒ o [^rnzci]Äƒ
SFX R Äƒ e [^rnzci]Äƒ                         s.f.pl.neart.
SFX R Äƒ ei [^rnzci]Äƒ                        s.f.sg.dat.
SFX R Äƒ ele [^rnzci]Äƒ                      s.f.pl.art.
SFX R Äƒ elor [^rnzc]Äƒ                      s.f.pl.dat.


SFX s Y 6
SFX s icÄƒ ica icÄƒ                        s.f.sg.art.
SFX s icÄƒ ico icÄƒ
SFX s icÄƒ icei icÄƒ                         s.f.sg.dat.
SFX s icÄƒ ice icÄƒ                          s.f.pl.neart.
SFX s icÄƒ icele icÄƒ                        s.f.pl.art.
SFX s icÄƒ icelor icÄƒ                       s.f.pl.dat.

#defect de singular
SFX a Y 2
SFX a   e     ele   e                  s.f.pl.art.
SFX a   e     elor  e                  s.f.pl.dat.
